Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4624
Procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by agreement.

(a) At any time after return from deployment, a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 may be terminated by an agreement to terminate signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

(b) A temporary agreement under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 granting custodial responsibility terminates:

(1) if an agreement to terminate under subsection (a) of this section specifies a date for termination, on that date; or

(2) if the agreement to terminate does not specify a date, on the date the agreement to terminate is signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

(c) In the absence of an agreement under subsection (a) of this section to terminate, a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility terminates under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 sixty days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent that the deploying parent has returned from deployment.

(d) If a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility was filed with a court pursuant to section 43-4612, an agreement to terminate the temporary agreement also must be filed with that court within a reasonable time after the signing of the agreement. The case number and heading of the case concerning custodial responsibility or child support must be provided to the court with the agreement to terminate.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 24.